Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,120.01
Summary cease and desist order; authorized; procedure.

Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that a title insurance agent is violating the Title Insurance Agent Act or any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder, the director may, without notice, and before a hearing, issue a summary cease and desist order. At the same time the order is issued, the director shall serve notice to the title insurance agent of the reasons for such order and that the title insurance agent may request a hearing in writing within ten business days after receipt of the order. If a hearing is requested, the director shall schedule a hearing within ten business days after receipt of the request. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. If a hearing is not requested and none is ordered by the director, the order shall remain in effect until modified or vacated by the director. Any title insurance agent aggrieved by a final order of the director may appeal the order. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. In the event of noncompliance with a summary cease and desist order, the director may cause a complaint to be filed in the district court to enforce the order.

Laws 2004, LB 155, § 5.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.